Vermont, session 2025-2026, S186.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. COMMENCEMENT OF DELINQUENCY PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(d)(1) Any Unless subdivision (2) of this subsection applies, any
proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed any offense
other than those specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title or subdivision
(c)(2) or (3) of this section before attaining 19 years of age shall originate in
VT LEG #385914 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.186
2026 Page 2 of 5
the Family Division of the Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be
transferred in accordance with this chapter.
(2) In a proceeding in the Criminal Division concerning a child who is
alleged to have committed an offense specified in subsection 5204(a) of this
title or subdivision (c)(2) or (3) of this section, the child may elect to enter a
plea agreement in the Criminal Division to an offense other than one specified
in subsection 5204(a) of this title or subdivision (c)(2) or (3) of this section. If
the child elects to enter a plea agreement pursuant to this subdivision, the
Criminal Division shall retain jurisdiction over the proceeding.
* * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 5203 is amended to read:
§ 5203. TRANSFER FROM OTHER COURTS
(a) If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the
defendant was under 19 years of age at the time the offense charged was
alleged to have been committed and the offense charged is an offense not
specified in subsection 5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title,
that court shall, unless the child elects to enter a plea agreement in the Criminal
Division pursuant to subdivision 5201(d)(2) of this title, forthwith transfer the
proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of
this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter
as a child charged with a delinquent act.
VT LEG #385914 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.186
2026 Page 3 of 5
* * *
(c) If it appears to the State’s Attorney that the defendant was under 19
years of age at the time the felony offense charged was alleged to have been
committed and the felony charged is not an offense specified in subsection
5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title, the State’s Attorney shall,
unless the child elects to enter a plea agreement in the Criminal Division
pursuant to subdivision 5201(d)(2) of this title, file charges in the Family
Division of the Superior Court, pursuant to section 5201 of this title. The
Family Division may transfer the proceeding to the Criminal Division pursuant
to section 5204 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. COMMENCEMENT OF DELINQUENCY PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(d)(1) Any Unless subdivision (2) of this subsection applies, any
proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed any offense
other than those specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title or subdivision
(c)(2) or (3) of this section before attaining 20 years of age shall originate in
the Family Division of the Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be
transferred in accordance with this chapter.
VT LEG #385914 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.186
2026 Page 4 of 5
(2) In a proceeding in the Criminal Division concerning a child who is
alleged to have committed an offense specified in subsection 5204(a) of this
title or subdivision (c)(2) or (3) of this section, the child may elect to enter a
plea agreement in the Criminal Division to an offense other than one specified
in subsection 5204(a) of this title or subdivision (c)(2) or (3) of this section. If
the child elects to enter a plea agreement pursuant to this subdivision, the
Criminal Division shall retain jurisdiction over the proceeding.
* * *
Sec. 4. 33 V.S.A. § 5203 is amended to read:
§ 5203. TRANSFER FROM OTHER COURTS
(a) If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the
defendant was under 20 years of age at the time the offense charged was
alleged to have been committed and the offense charged is an offense not
specified in subsection 5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title,
that court shall, unless the child elects to enter a plea agreement in the Criminal
Division pursuant to subdivision 5201(d)(2) of this title, forthwith transfer the
proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of
this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter
as a child charged with a delinquent act.
* * *
VT LEG #385914 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.186
2026 Page 5 of 5
(c) If it appears to the State’s Attorney that the defendant was under 20
years of age at the time the felony offense charged was alleged to have been
committed and the felony charged is not an offense specified in subsection
5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title, the State’s Attorney shall,
unless the child elects to enter a plea agreement in the Criminal Division
pursuant to subdivision 5201(d)(2) of this title, file charges in the Family
Division of the Superior Court, pursuant to section 5201 of this title. The
Family Division may transfer the proceeding to the Criminal Division pursuant
to section 5204 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. 1 and 2 and this section shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 3 and 4 shall take effect on July 2, 2027.
VT LEG #385914 v.1